Wyoming, session 2026, SF0011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-14-101(a), (b) and by creating a
new subsection (d) and 42-2-103(c) are amended to read:
19-14-101. Burial of indigents.
(a) The board of county commissioners of each county
shall provide for the preparation of the body and
transmittal to and burial in the veteran's cemetery of any
veteran other than a dishonorably discharged veteran of the
armed forces of the United States who served on behalf of
the United States in any war or conflict as defined in
section 101, title 38, United States Code and who dies
leaving insufficient funds to defray the necessary funeral
expenses. The amount expended for transporting the body
shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00). The amount
paid under this section for burial shall not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00). Each board shall
account for the county expenses incurred under this
subsection during a fiscal year. By August 1 of each year,
a county may request reimbursement by the department of
family services for the expenses incurred under this
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0011
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
subsection for the preceding fiscal year. The department of
family services shall reimburse the expenses in accordance
with W.S. 35-1-428(c).
(b) Before assuming charge and expense for
preparation and transmittal of the body and burial, each
board of county commissioners shall first determine
according to procedures they establish that the deceased
veteran of the armed forces of the United States whose body
they are called upon to bury served in the armed forces of
the United States, during World War II or any preceding war
in which the United States was a party or during the Korean
or Vietnam conflicts, was other than dishonorably
discharged and died in the county leaving insufficient
means to defray the necessary funeral expenses.
(d) Payment made for burial expenses by the board of
county commissioners in accordance with this section shall
be considered payment of last resort that follows all other
sources and is provided subsequent to all other benefits.
42-2-103. Provision of assistance and services;
duties of department; burial assistance; department of
health state supplemental security income program.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
article and subject to the availability of funds, the
department shall pay the burial or cremation expenses of
any recipient of aid under the personal opportunities with
employment responsibilities (POWER) program, supplemental
security income or Medicaid at the time of his death and
without sufficient means in his own estate or other
resources to provide burial or cremation. The amount paid
under this subsection shall not exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00)
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0011
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
after consideration of funds available to the recipient
from all other sources. In addition to the amount paid for
burial or cremation under this subsection, an amount shall
be paid for transportation expenses to the veteran's
cemetery for a deceased veteran who qualifies for burial
there and who qualifies for burial expenses under this
subsection in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars
($500.00). In determining eligibility under this
subsection, the department shall not consider as available
funds, an amount up to or equal to one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500.00) of the corpus of a Medicaid
qualifying trust meeting the requirements of W.S. 42-4-113.
No board of county commissioners shall be responsible for
any burial or cremation expenses in excess of the amount
paid under this subsection. Burial or cremation expenses
under this subsection shall not include those expenses
relating to cemetery costs.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0011
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4